Idaho, session 2025, H0037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-2716, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-2716. METHODS OF EXECUTION. (1) The punishment of death shall be
inflicted by the following methods:
(a) Firing squad; or
(a) (b) Continuous, intravenous administration of a lethal quantity of
a substance or substances approved by the director of the Idaho depart-
ment of correction until death is pronounced by a coroner or a deputy
coroner; or.
(b) Firing squad.
(2) Not later than five (5) days after the issuance of a death warrant,
the director of the Idaho department of correction must determine, and cer-
tify by affidavit to the court that issued the death warrant, whether execu-
tion by lethal injection firing squad, as described in subsection (1)(a) of
this section, is available.
(3) If the director certifies that lethal injection firing squad is
available, the method of execution shall be lethal injection firing squad.
(4) If the director does not certify that lethal injection firing squad
is available, or fails to file a certification as required pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section, or otherwise determines that lethal injection
is unavailable, the method of execution shall be firing squad lethal injec-
tion, as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) If a court holds that lethal injection firing squad is unconstitu-
tional, on its face or as applied, or otherwise determines that firing squad
lethal injection is a constitutionally required method of execution, the
method of execution shall be firing squad lethal injection.
(6) The director shall determine the procedures to be used in any execu-
tion.
(7) The provisions of this section shall apply to all executions car-
ried out on and after the effective date of this enactment, irrespective of
the date sentence was imposed.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after July
1, 2026.